Rhode Island statutes. Title 40.1 Behavioral Healthcare, Developmental Disabilities and Hospitals
Chapter 29 Governor’s Council on Behavioral Health

40.1-29-1.
Name.

There is hereby created the Governor’s Council on Behavioral Health, hereinafter referred to as “the council.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2001, ch. 57, § 1.

40.1-29-2.
Legislative purpose.

The purpose of the council is to advise the governor and general assembly on policies, goals, and operations of the behavioral health program, including the program areas of substance use disorder and mental health, and on other matters the director of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals refers to it and to encourage public understanding and support of the behavioral health program.

History of Section.

P.L. 2001, ch. 57, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 124, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 143, § 1.

40.1-29-3.
Members.

The council shall consist of thirty-two (32) voting members.

There shall be four (4) members of the legislature, two (2) shall be from the senate and shall be appointed by the senate president to serve for their legislative term, one from each of the major political parties, and two (2) shall be from the house of representatives and shall be appointed by the speaker to serve for their legislative term, one from each of the two (2) major political parties.

The nonlegislative members shall be the executive director of the Substance Use and Mental Health Leadership Council of RI, the mental health advocate, the child advocate, a representative of the AFL-CIO to be appointed by the governor, and the president of the Hospital Association of Rhode Island or a designee thereof.

The remaining twenty-three (23) public members shall be appointed by and serve at the pleasure of the governor and shall represent community interests such as substance use disorder treatment and prevention professionals; youth with behavioral health challenges, or their representatives; consumers of substance-use disorder programs and their families; mental health treatment professionals; adult and elderly consumers of mental health services and their families; families of children who are consumers of mental health and substance-use disorder services; the judiciary; criminal justice officials; and local government officials.

Not less than fifty (50%) percent of the public members shall be individuals who are not state employees or providers of behavioral health services.

There shall be sufficient representation by the families of children who are consumers of mental health and substance-use disorder services in order to ensure adequate representation of such children.

Every effort shall be made to ensure that appointed members represent the cultural diversity of the state.

All members shall have demonstrable expertise in, or experience with, substance use disorders or mental health services in Rhode Island. In addition, the directors, or their designees, of the departments of children, youth and families; corrections; education; health; human services; behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals; the office of healthy aging; the attorney general, or designee, and the executive director of the Rhode Island justice commission shall serve as ex officio and without a vote as members of the council.

Any vacancy that may occur in the council shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointments.

The governor shall designate one member as the chairperson of the council.

History of Section.

P.L. 2001, ch. 57, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 216, § 33; P.L. 2017, ch. 124, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 143, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 168, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 172, § 1; P.L. 2022, ch. 286, § 1, effective June 29, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 287, § 1, effective June 29, 2022.

40.1-29-4.
Meetings.

The council shall meet at least six (6) times a year. Failure to attend three (3) meetings in a year may result in a recommendation of removal from the council to the governor or other appropriate appointing authority. A quorum at the meeting shall consist of seven (7) voting members present.

History of Section.

P.L. 2001, ch. 57, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 124, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 143, § 1.

40.1-29-5.
Functions.

The functions of the council shall be:

To review and evaluate the behavioral health needs and problems in the state and propose such recommendations as are appropriate;

To stimulate and seek the development and coordination of all programs relating to behavioral health, including, but not limited to, such areas as care and treatment, prevention, manpower, research, and public education;

To encourage interdisciplinary approaches to combating, treating, and preventing substance use disorders and mental illness, focusing in particular on integrating support systems for behavioral health care;

To act as the advisory committee to the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals and the governor on any funds made available to the department by the federal government for substance use disorders and/or mental health treatment and prevention purposes;

To stimulate and investigate research as it affects planning and implementation of behavioral healthcare systems in the healthcare environment;

To make an annual report to the governor and the general assembly during the month of January, setting forth:

The nature and extent of the behavioral healthcare problems in the state;

Information and recommendations as the council deems necessary to deal with the problems as documented;

A review of the council’s activities during the preceding year, including but not limited to, reports relative to activity, performance, and need;

Any plans developed by the council to deal with the behavioral healthcare problems identified by the council;

Other recommendations as may be appropriate and in the public interest.

History of Section.

P.L. 2001, ch. 57, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 124, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 143, § 1.

40.1-29-6.
Staff and employees.

The director of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals shall provide the council with professional and secretarial staff and other support as shall be appropriate for it to carry out its designated functions. The director of the department of children, youth and families and the director of the office of healthy aging shall provide the council with additional professional and secretarial staff and other employees as shall be appropriate for the council to carry out functions related to the respective responsibilities of these departments. All departments and agencies of the state shall furnish any advice and information, documentary and otherwise, to the council that is deemed necessary to fulfill the purpose and functions of the council.

History of Section.

P.L. 2001, ch. 57, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 124, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 143, § 1.